District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.21

Procurement of certificate of authority by foreign or alien companies — Application forms.

A foreign or alien company, in order to procure a certificate of authority to transact business in the District, shall make application therefor to the Commissioner on forms prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner. Such forms shall be executed for the company, by its president or vice-president, or executive officer corresponding thereto, and verified by such officer, and if a corporation the corporate seal shall be thereto affixed, attested by its secretary or other proper officer.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1074, ch. 792, ch. II, § 21
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(r)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Foreign or alien fraternal benefit society, admission, see § 31-5326.
This section is referenced in § 31-5326.
1981 Ed., § 35-1525.
1973 Ed., § 35-1325.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.